Connecticut, session 2026, HB05067.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That chapter 229 of the general statutes be amended to establish a
personal income tax deduction for the amount of unreimbursed medical
expenses that exceed seven and one-half per cent of a taxpayer's
adjusted gross income.